Washington statutes.
RCW 31.35.070

Examination of agricultural lender.

(1) The director shall visit each agricultural lender at least every twenty-four months for the purpose of assuring that the agricultural lender remains in compliance with and qualified for the loan guaranty program.

(a) The director may accept timely audited financial statements and other timely reports the director determines to be relevant and accurate as part of a full and complete examination of the agricultural lender. The director shall make an independent review of loans guaranteed by the loan guaranty program.

(b) The agricultural lender shall be exempt from examination under this subsection if it terminates its activities under the loan guaranty program and no loans guaranteed by the loan guaranty program remain on the books. This exemption becomes effective upon notification to the director. The director shall confirm termination of activities under the loan guaranty program with the appropriate federal agency.

(c) All examination reports and all information obtained by the director and the director's staff in conducting examinations of an agricultural lender are confidential to the same extent bank examinations are confidential under *RCW 30.04.075.

(d) All examination reports may be shared with other state or federal agencies consistent with **chapter 30.04 RCW.

(2) A director, officer, or employee of an agricultural lender or of a subsidiary of an agricultural lender being examined by the director or a person having custody of any of the books, accounts, or records of the agricultural lender or of the subsidiary shall facilitate the examination so far as it is in his or her power to do so.

(3) If in the opinion of the director it is necessary in the examination of an agricultural lender or of a subsidiary of an agricultural lender, the director may retain any certified public accountant, attorney, appraiser, or other person to assist the director. The agricultural lender being examined shall pay the fees of a person retained by the director under this subsection.

[ 1994 c 92 s 256; 1990 c 134 s 7.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 30.04.075 was recodified as RCW 30A.04.075 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

**(2) Chapter 30.04 RCW was recodified as chapter 30A.04 RCW pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.